Wisconsin, session 2025, SB339.
do enact as follows:SB339,13Section 1. 23.33 (1) (ng) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB339,1,4423.33 (1) (ng) 1. a. A weight, without fluids, of 3,000 3,500 pounds or less.SB339,25Section 2. 23.33 (1) (ng) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB339,2,5123.33 (1) (ng) 2. a. It does not meet federal motor vehicle safety standards in 2effect on July 1, 2012; is not a golf cart, low-speed vehicle, dune buggy, mini-truck, 3or tracked vehicle; is designed to be used primarily off of a highway; and has, and 4was originally manufactured with, a weight, without fluids, of not more than 3,000 53,500 pounds.SB339,2,66